dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX B 0 lalingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lalingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lalingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lalingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 laliyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lalizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 li/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 li/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ling/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 linga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lingazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 liyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lizo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lu/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 lu/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 lung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 lunga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lungazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 luyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 luzo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lw/di [ae]
PFX B 0 lw/d [ae] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 lw/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 lwa/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 lwal/id o RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 lwalu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 lwalung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwalungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 lwaluyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lwaluzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 lwalw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 n/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 n/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 n/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 na/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 nan/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 nani/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 naning/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 naninga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 naningayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naningayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naningayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naningazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naningazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naningazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 naniyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 nanizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ng/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 ng/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 ng/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 nga/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 ngang/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 ngangi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 nganging/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 nganginga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngangiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ngangizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ngi/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 ngi/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 nging/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 nginga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngingazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ngiyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ngizo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ni/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 ni/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ning/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ninga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ningazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 niyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 nizo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 o/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ob [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ob/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oba [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 obeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 obenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 obengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 obeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 obezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 obu/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obuyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obuzo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ok/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oku/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
