dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
abuzwa/BC
ahlula/BC
akhelana/BC
alela/BCY
ambuka/BC
amuleka/BC
anela/BC
angca/BC
aphula/BC
azisa/BC
babazeka/BC
bakaza/BC
balwa/BCY
bambezela/BC
bandlulula/BC
basa/BC
bazeka/BC
beka/BC
belesela/BC
betheleka/BC
bhaca/BC
bhadula/BC
bhala/BC
bhamuza/BC
bhasobha/BC
bhebhezela/BC
bhedula/BC
bhekwa/BCY
bhibiza/BC
bhimba/BC
bhodla/BC
bhokloza/BC
bhonya/BC
bhubhudla/BC
bhukuda/BC
bhunguka/BC
bihla/BC
bila/BC
bipha/BC
bohla/BC
bonakalisa/BC
bonelela/BC
bopha/BC
bubula/BC
bukela/BC
buna/BC
bunya/BC
buthela/BC
buyisana/BC
caba/BC
cambalala/BC
caphuna/BC
casula/BC
caya/BC
cela/BC
chama/BC
chathaza/BC
chena/BC
chiliza/BC
chocha/BC
chukuluza/BC
chwephesha/BC
cikiza/BC
cindeza/BC
coba/BC
cokama/BC
cuba/BC
culela/BC
cutha/BC
cwebezela/BC
cwiya/BC
daka/BC
damuka/BC
dayisa/BC
dela/BC
dibana/BC
dikila/BC
dinda/BC
dingwa/BCY
dlala/BC
dlavuza/BC
dlikiza/BC
dlondlobala/BC
dlula/BC
doba/BC
donsa/BC
dudla/BC
dula/BC
dumela/BC
dusa/BC
dweshula/BC
ebuka/BC
ecwecwa/BC
ega/BC
ehlakala/BCY
ehluka/BC
ejwayela/BC
ela/BC
elekelela/BC
embatha/BC
emitha/BC
emulisa/BC
enanela/BC
endlala/BC
enela/BC
engama/BC
enqena/BC
enyela/BC
enzakala/BC
enzisa/BC
ephula/BC
eqisa/BC
esasa/BC
esukela/BC
etha/BC
ethimula/BC
ethwala/BC
ewusa/BC
exwaya/BC
ezela/BC
faka/BC
fana/BC
faya/BC
fesa/BC
fifiyela/BC
fikelela/BC
finyela/BC
fisela/BC
fosa/BC
fukama/BC
fukuza/BC
fumanisa/BC
funa/BC
funeka/BC
fuqa/BC
gaba/BC
gabisela/BC
gagamela/BC
gana/BC
ganela/BC
gaqa/BC
gaya/BC
gcakela/BC
gcoba/BC
gcula/BC
geba/BC
gelekeqa/BC
genga/BC
giba/BC
gila/BC
gingqa/BC
gobela/BC
goga/BC
gola/BC
gonqa/BC
goya/BC
gqaja/BC
gqekeza/BC
gqiza/BC
gqolozela/BC
gquma/BC
gubuda/BC
gudluka/BC
guga/BC
gunga/BC
guqisa/BC
gwaca/BC
gwaqa/BC
gwegwa/BC
gwinqa/BC
gxambukela/BC
gxoba/BC
habula/BC
hamba/BC
hanjwa/BCY
heha/BC
hhuka/BC
hlaba/BC
hlafuna/BC
hlakanipha/BC
hlalisa/BC
hlambuluka/BC
hlangabezana/BC
hlanganywa/BCY
hlasimula/BC
hleba/BC
hlela/BC
hleza/BC
hlinza/BC
hlohloloza/BC
hlolisa/BC
hlomula/BC
hlosa/BC
hlukumeza/BC
hlunama/BC
hlushwa/BCY
hluthula/BC
hlwenga/BC
holela/BC
huba/BC
hula/BC
huzuka/BC
jabula/BC
jeqa/BC
jikaza/BC
jivaza/BC
jola/BC
jula/BC
jwayeza/BC
kanisa/BC
ketula/BC
khahla/BC
khakhamela/BC
khalima/BC
khamisa/BC
khangisa/BC
khanukela/BC
khaphuzela/BC
khathaza/BC
khaza/BC
khenka/BC
khetha/BC
khinyabeza/BC
khiya/BC
kholisa/BC
khonza/BC
khucula/BC
khulelisa/BC
khuma/BC
khuphula/BC
khweca/BC
kitaza/BC
klina/BC
kopolota/BC
lala/BC
landisa/BC
laza/BC
levela/BC
linga/BC
lobola/BC
lovela/BC
lumbanisa/BC
lutheka/BC
masha/BC
mbela/BC
memela/BC
minyana/BC
mpabaza/BC
mula/BC
ncelisa/BC
nciphisa/BC
ndonda/BC
nentsha/BC
ngcala/BC
ngengeza/BC
ngqubuza/BC
nikela/BC
nkenketha/BC
nothisa/BC
nqena/BC
nqunda/BC
nta/BC
ntenga/BC
nukubeza/BC
nxenxa/BC
nyala/BC
nyathelisa/BC
nyonka/BC
obuka/BC
oma/BC
onela/BC
ophula/BC
othula/BC
phafuza/BC
phamba/BC
phanyeka/BC
phasela/BC
phazama/BC
phemba/BC
phephela/BC
phethela/BC
phimisa/BC
phitha/BC
phophotha/BC
phuca/BC
phumela/BC
phunyuka/BC
phuthaza/BC
potshoza/BC
qakala/BC
qanda/BC
qatha/BC
qephuza/BC
qhathanisa/BC
qhetha/BC
qhubeza/BC
qhumbuza/BC
qhwanda/BC
qoka/BC
qongelela/BC
quba/BC
qupha/BC
sabela/BC
saphaza/BC
sebenzela/BC
sesha/BC
sha/BC
shaqa/BC
shebeleza/BC
sheshisa/BC
shikishela/BC
shisela/BC
shola/BC
shukuma/BC
shushumbisa/BC
shwiba/BC
simama/BC
sinya/BC
sitha/BC
sola/BC
sopha/BC
sulela/BC
swela/BC
tatama/BC
thaka/BC
thandabula/BC
thaphuza/BC
theka/BC
thembeka/BC
thengwa/BCY
thintwa/BCY
thokozisa/BC
thonya/BC
thula/BC
thuntubeza/BC
thuthukisa/BC
titinya/BC
tshelwa/BCY
tula/BC
velela/BC
vimbanisa/BC
vukela/BC
vumela/BC
vusa/BC
waka/BC
wisa/BC
wusha/BC
xebuka/BC
xhanta/BC
xhuga/BC
xolela/BC
xukuxa/BC
yala/BC
yekelela/BC
yikaza/BC
yobuza/BC
zaba/BC
zamazama/BC
zibusa/BC
zinga/BC
zonda/BC
zwakala/BC
PFX C 0 kw/BY [ae] OBJ
PFX C 0 ngab/BY [aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngali/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngaw/BY [aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 s/BY [aeiou] PROG
PFX C 0 sal/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sas/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
